Rhode Island statutes. Title 12 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 21 Recovery of Fines, Penalties, and Forfeitures

12-21-1.
Methods of recovering fines and forfeitures.

Unless otherwise specially provided:

All fines of five hundred dollars ($500) and under shall be recovered by complaint and summons;

All fines of upwards of five hundred dollars ($500), by indictment or information;

All penalties and pecuniary forfeitures, by action of debt; and

All forfeitures of personal property, by complaint and warrant or by information.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 288, § 1; C.P.A. 1905, § 1231; G.L. 1909, ch. 357, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 410, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 631, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

12-21-1

; P.L. 1974, ch. 118, § 15; P.L. 1976, ch. 173, § 4.

12-21-2.
Limitation of prosecutions.

All suits or prosecutions founded upon any penal statute, which are wholly or in part for the use of the prosecutor, shall be brought within one year, and all other suits and prosecutions on a penal statute within two (2) years after the commission of the offense, unless otherwise specially provided.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 288, § 8; G.L. 1909, ch. 357, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 410, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 631, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

12-21-2

.

12-21-3.
Venue of actions based on penal statutes.

Unless otherwise specially provided, all fines of and informations founded on any penal statute shall be brought within the county in which the offense was committed, and not elsewhere; provided, that the superior court for the county of Providence shall have jurisdiction of all proceedings for the recovery of more than five hundred dollars ($500) when the offense was committed in the county of Bristol.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 288, § 2; C.P.A. 1905, § 1190; G.L. 1909, ch. 357, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 410, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 631, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

12-21-3

.

12-21-4.
Jurisdiction of district and superior courts.

All fines, penalties, and forfeitures, whether of money or property, of five hundred dollars ($500) and under or of the value of five hundred dollars ($500) and under, shall be prosecuted before a district court; if upwards of five hundred dollars ($500) in amount or value, before the superior court, unless otherwise specially provided.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 288, § 4; C.P.A. 1905, §§ 1216, 1231; G.L. 1909, ch. 357, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 410, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 631, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

12-21-4

.

12-21-5.
Action by town or city.

Whenever any penalty or forfeiture, or any part of a penalty or forfeiture, shall be given to any town by any penal statute, the town council may sue for the penalty or forfeiture in the name of the town, or the proper prosecuting officer in the name of any city which shall be entitled to the benefit of the penalty or forfeiture, and the town council may remit the whole of the penalty or forfeiture.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 288, § 9; G.L. 1909, ch. 357, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 410, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 631, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

12-21-5

.

12-21-6.
Commencement of period of neglect.

Whenever any penalty shall be imposed for neglect during any period of time, the neglect may be alleged to have commenced at any specified time, and shall be reckoned from the time so specified.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 288, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 357, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 410, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 631, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

12-21-6

.

12-21-7.
Residence of court member in city or town to be benefited.

In actions for the recovery of any penalty or forfeiture before any court, it shall be no cause of exception that any member of the court resides or has property in the city or town in which the offense was committed, or that the penalty or any part of the penalty is recoverable to the use of the city or town.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 288, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 357, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 410, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 631, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

12-21-7

.

12-21-8.
Plea of general issue.

The defendant to an action for a penalty may plead the general issue, and under it give any special matter in evidence.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 288, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 357, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 410, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 631, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

12-21-8

.

12-21-9.
Commitment for failure to obey judgment or sentence.

If any person against whom sentence is passed or judgment rendered, under any penal statute, shall refuse or neglect to perform the sentence or to pay the judgment, he or she shall, by order of the court passing the sentence or by the officer charged with the execution issued on the judgment, be committed to the adult correctional institutions, and be imprisoned there until the sentence is performed or he or she is discharged by due course of law.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 288, § 10; G.L. 1909, ch. 357, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 410, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 631, § 10; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

12-21-9

.

12-21-10.
Disposition of recoveries.

Unless otherwise specially provided:

All fines recovered shall be to the use of the state;

All penalties and pecuniary forfeitures, one-half (1/2) to the use of the state and one-half (1/2) to the use of the person who shall sue for it; and

All forfeitures of personal property shall be disposed of as provided by law.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 288, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 357, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 410, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 631, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

12-21-10

.

12-21-11.
Quarterly reports and payments by district court.

The clerk of each division of the district court, shall, between the first and fifteenth days of February, May, August, and November in each year, make an itemized return in writing to the city or town treasurer of every city or town in the division of all fines received by the clerk during the preceding quarter, which or part of which shall be due to the city or town, and of costs paid by the clerk out of money belonging to the city or town, and the amount and circumstances of all of these fines received by the clerk and costs paid by the clerk and not included in any previous return. The clerk making the return shall immediately thereafter cause to be paid to the city or town treasurer the balance of all moneys belonging to the city or town.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 183; G.L. 1909, ch. 281, § 36; G.L. 1923, ch. 331, § 36; G.L. 1938, ch. 501, § 36; G.L. 1956, §

12-21-11

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 28.

12-21-12.
Payment of costs taxable to cities or towns out of fines due.

All costs taxed by courts in criminal prosecutions, which by law any city or town is or may be required to pay, may be paid by the clerk to the several persons entitled to them, out of fines in his or her hands belonging to the city or town; provided, that fines received by the clerk which are by law to be applied to the support of the public schools shall not be used in the payment of these costs.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 184; G.L. 1909, ch. 281, § 37; G.L. 1923, ch. 331, § 37; G.L. 1938, ch. 501, § 37; G.L. 1956, §

12-21-12

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 28.

12-21-13.
Accounting by clerk on vacation of office.

Whenever the clerk shall vacate his or her office he or she shall render account and pay over any money which may be due from him or her as clerk to the city or town within ten (10) days after vacating the office.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 185; G.L. 1909, ch. 281, § 38; G.L. 1923, ch. 331, § 38; G.L. 1938, ch. 501, § 38; G.L. 1956, §

12-21-13

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 28.

12-21-14.
Forfeiture for failure to account.

Every clerk who shall neglect or refuse to account with the city or town treasurer as required in this chapter, or to pay over to him or her all moneys due the city or town at the time when they ought to be paid, shall forfeit thrice the amount of the moneys so withheld or not paid, to be recovered by an action of debt for the use of the city or town.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 186; G.L. 1909, ch. 281, § 39; G.L. 1923, ch. 331, § 39; G.L. 1938, ch. 501, § 39; G.L. 1956, §

12-21-14

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 28.

12-21-15.
Access of city or town treasurer to district court records.

The city or town treasurer of any city or town in the division in which the district court is situated shall have access at all times to all books and papers in the office of the division, and may examine them for the purpose of verifying the returns of the clerk.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 187; G.L. 1909, ch. 281, § 40; G.L. 1923, ch. 331, § 40; G.L. 1938, ch. 501, § 40; G.L. 1956, §

12-21-15

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 28.

12-21-16.
Payment of amounts due to the state.

All fines and all penalties and forfeitures to the use of the state shall be paid over to the general treasurer, unless otherwise specially provided.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 288, § 11; G.L. 1909, ch. 357, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 410, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 631, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

12-21-17

.

12-21-17.
Payment and accounting for fines due other than to state.

All fines recovered under any statute of this state, the whole or any part of which may be due or payable to any city, town, or society, or to any person as complainant, shall be accounted for with the state controller, and be paid to the general treasurer. The general treasurer shall, upon the order of the state controller, pay to the city, town, society, or person so much of the amount of the fine so recovered as the city, town, society, or person may be entitled to, which order shall be drawn by the state controller whenever he or she shall receive a proper return or certificate from the clerk of the court in which the fine was imposed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1898, ch. 536, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 357, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 410, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 631, § 12; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; G.L. 1956, §

12-21-17

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 28.

12-21-18.
Payment of fine liquidated by labor.

Whenever a fine payable in whole or in part, to any city, town, or society, or to any person as complainant, shall have been liquidated by the labor of the person fined, or paid by him or her at any jail in the state, the general treasurer shall, upon the proper order of the state controller, pay to the city, town, society or person so much of the amount of the fine so liquidated or paid, as the city, town, society, or person may be entitled to, which order of the state controller shall be by him or her drawn on his or her receiving a proper return or certificate from the clerk of the court in which the fine was imposed, together with a proper return or certificate from the jailer.

History of Section.

P.L. 1898, ch. 536, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 357, § 13; G.L. 1923, ch. 410, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 631, § 13; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; G.L. 1956, §

12-21-18

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 28.

12-21-19.
Payment of fines to general treasurer — Accounting.

Whenever a fine is recovered under any statute of this state, the whole of which may be due the Rhode Island Society for the Prevention of Cruelty to Animals, the Children’s Friend and Service, or to any other society, or the one-half (1/2) of which may be due the state or any society, or to any person, as complainant, the whole of the fine shall be accounted for with the state controller and paid to the general treasurer. The fine due any society, or the one-half (1/2) fine due any society, or to any person, as complainant, shall be paid by the general treasurer upon order of the state controller and the state controller shall draw his or her order whenever he or she shall receive a proper return or certificate from the clerk of the court in which the fine was imposed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 288, § 12; G.L. 1909, ch. 357, § 14; G.L. 1923, ch. 410, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 631, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

12-21-19

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 28.

12-21-20.
Order to pay costs and determination of ability to pay.

If, upon any complaint or prosecution before any court, the defendant shall be ordered to pay a fine, enter into a recognizance, or suffer any penalty or forfeiture, he or she shall also be ordered to pay all costs of prosecution, unless directed otherwise by law.

If a defendant is determined to be indigent by the standards set forth in §

12-20-10(a)

following the defendant’s sworn testimony or by submission of a financial assessment instrument, all court costs, assessments, and fees shall be waived. The financial assessment instrument shall be:

Created by the court based upon sound and generally accepted accounting principles and may be modified by the court from time to time;

Include any and all relevant information relating to the defendant’s present ability to pay; and

Be certified or made by the defendant under oath.

Non-indigent defendants claiming a limited or inability to pay court costs, assessments, and fees may request the court waive court costs, assessments, and fees upon submission of a completed financial assessment instrument. Upon submission of a completed financial assessment instrument, a defendant may during sentencing or any time after the disposition of the matter request an ability to pay determination to seek the remission or reduction of any fines, court costs, assessments, fees and other costs of prosecution, or changes to the terms of a payment schedule.

[Deleted by P.L. 2022, ch. 200, § 3 and P.L. 2022, ch. 201, § 3.]

[Deleted by P.L. 2022, ch. 200, § 3 and P.L. 2022, ch. 201, § 3.]

When persons come before the court for failure to pay fines, fees, assessments and other costs of prosecution, or court ordered restitution, and their ability to pay and payment schedule has not been previously determined, the judge, the clerk of the court, or their designee shall make these determinations by use of the procedures specified in this section.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the court’s ability, after hearing in open court, to revise findings about a person’s ability to pay and payment schedule made by the clerk of the court or designee, based upon the receipt of newly available, relevant, or other information.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 288, § 13; G.L. 1909, ch. 357, § 15; G.L. 1923, ch. 410, § 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 631, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

12-21-20

; P.L. 2008, ch. 297, § 5; P.L. 2008, ch. 326, § 5; P.L. 2022, ch. 200, § 3, effective June 27, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 201, § 3, effective June 27, 2022.

12-21-21.
Guilty plea and payment of fine by person outside state.

Whenever any person who is charged with the commission of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine shall be outside the confines of this state, the defendant may, with the approval of a judge of the district court for the division in which the complaint may be pending, or with the approval of the justice of the superior court in charge of criminal appeals if the cause is pending on appeal before the superior court, by instrument in writing and duly acknowledged before an appropriate officer, authorize his or her attorney of record to appear in open court and enter on his or her behalf a plea of guilty or nolo contendere, and to pay the fine that may be assessed by the court, together with the costs of prosecution, if any, that may be assessed by the court. Every written authorization shall be filed with the clerk of the court, and shall be retained by the clerk, together with the original complaint, as a portion of the record of the case.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1680, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

12-21-21

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 28.

12-21-22.
Payment of fines due to person or corporation from proceeds of forfeited recognizance.

If any recognizance shall be forfeited in any case in which, if the recognizor had been convicted, any sum might have been due to the complainant, or any person or corporation, the court in which the amount of the recognizance is, in whole or part, recovered, shall ascertain the just sum and costs, if any, which are due from the recognizor to the complainant, person, or corporation and grant a certificate for the amount, which, upon being audited by the state controller, shall be paid, upon his or her warrant for the amount upon the general treasurer.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 288, § 14; G.L. 1909, ch. 357, § 16; G.L. 1923, ch. 410, § 16; G.L. 1938, ch. 631, § 16; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; G.L. 1956, §

12-21-22

.

12-21-23.
Seizure and retention of forfeited property.

Whenever any personal property shall be forfeited for any violation of law, any deputy sheriff, town sergeant, or town constable, or any person by law authorized to seize the property, may take and retain the property until he or she shall deliver it to a proper officer having a warrant to take and detain the property.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 288, § 15; G.L. 1909, ch. 357, § 17; G.L. 1923, ch. 410, § 17; G.L. 1938, ch. 631, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

12-21-23

; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 47; P.L. 2015, ch. 260, § 25; P.L. 2015, ch. 275, § 25.

12-21-24.
Complaint or information asking forfeiture.

The person making or directing a seizure shall without unnecessary delay make complaint on oath and in writing to a judge of the district court for the division in which the offense for which the forfeiture has accrued was committed, regardless of the value of the property seized, and jurisdiction is conferred on the district court to try and determine the matter notwithstanding the value of the property seized is in excess of five thousand dollars ($5,000).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 288, § 16; C.P.A. 1905, § 1222; P.L. 1906, ch. 1340, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 357, § 18; G.L. 1923, ch. 410, § 18; G.L. 1938, ch. 631, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

12-21-24

; P.L. 1965, ch. 168, § 8; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 28.

12-21-25.
Issuance of warrant to take and detain forfeited property.

Upon making a complaint or filing an information for a forfeiture, a warrant shall be issued to the proper officer, requiring him or her to take the property into his or her custody and to detain it until legally disposed of.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 288, § 17; G.L. 1909, ch. 357, § 19; G.L. 1923, ch. 410, § 19; G.L. 1938, ch. 631, § 19; G.L. 1956, §

12-21-25

.

12-21-26.
Notice of complaint or information.

Notice of complaint or information shall be issued by the court to the owner, if known, otherwise notice shall be published in some newspaper published in the vicinity for a period of at least two (2) weeks, that all persons interested may appear, either in person or by attorney, at the time and place appointed in the notice for trial, and show cause, if they have any, why judgment of forfeiture should not be passed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 288, § 18; G.L. 1909, ch. 357, § 20; G.L. 1923, ch. 410, § 20; G.L. 1938, ch. 631, § 20; G.L. 1956, §

12-21-26

.

12-21-27.
Sale of property pending judgment on forfeiture.

If any person shall appear and claim the property, it may be sold, by consent of parties, provided it is of such nature that it may be lawfully sold and used, and the law does not require it to be destroyed or otherwise in some special manner disposed of, or under like provision it may in any case be sold, if of a perishable, wasting, or expensive character to keep, in like manner as is provided for the sale of similar property when attached on civil process, in which case the proceeds of the sale, after deducting the charges of the sale, shall for all purposes represent the thing sold and be subject to the judgment and order of the court.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 288, § 19; G.L. 1909, ch. 357, § 21; G.L. 1923, ch. 410, § 21; G.L. 1938, ch. 631, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

12-21-27

.

12-21-28.
Return of property to claimant on bond.

Unless by law the property seized is necessarily subject, upon judgment of forfeiture, to be destroyed, it shall, at the request of the claimant, be appraised by appraisers appointed for that purpose by the court and be delivered to the claimant upon his or her giving bond in double the amount of the appraised value, with sufficient sureties, running to the person or corporation to whom the property would be forfeited, or to the state, if the state is entitled in whole or part to the property upon forfeiture, to pay to them the appraised value of the property and costs in case final judgment or forfeiture is entered up.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 288, § 20; G.L. 1909, ch. 357, § 22; G.L. 1923, ch. 410, § 22; G.L. 1938, ch. 631, § 22; G.L. 1956, §

12-21-28

.

12-21-29.
Trial and judgment.

The case may be tried by a jury, if in the superior court, upon the request of either party, or otherwise by the court, and the cause of forfeiture alleged being proved, the court which shall try the cause shall enter up judgment for the forfeiture and disposition of the property according to law.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 288, § 21; C.P.A. 1905, § 1216; G.L. 1909, ch. 357, § 23; G.L. 1923, ch. 410, § 23; G.L. 1938, ch. 631, § 23; G.L. 1956, §

12-21-29

.

12-21-30.
Appeal from district court judgment of forfeiture.

An appeal may be claimed by either party from any judgment of forfeiture rendered by the district court, to be taken in like manner as by defendants in criminal cases within the jurisdiction of the district court to try and determine, to the superior court for the same county in which the division of the district court rendering judgment is situated and like proceedings may be had as in cases of informations for forfeitures originally filed in the court.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 288, § 22; C.P.A. 1905, § 1191; G.L. 1909, ch. 357, § 24; G.L. 1923, ch. 410, § 24; G.L. 1938, ch. 631, § 24; G.L. 1956, §

12-21-30

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 28.

12-21-31.
Finality of superior court judgment.

The judgment of the superior court shall be final in all cases of forfeitures, whether originally commenced in the court or brought there by appeal under the provisions of this chapter, unless a new trial is ordered, for cause shown, by the supreme court.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 288, § 23; G.L. 1909, ch. 357, § 25; G.L. 1923, ch. 410, § 25; G.L. 1938, ch. 631, § 25; G.L. 1956, §

12-21-31

.

12-21-32.
Costs and damages on forfeiture action.

Costs shall be awarded to the prosecutor if a reasonable cause of seizure appear, in which shall be included the necessary expenses of the seizure and detention of the property; but in case no reasonable cause of seizure shall appear, costs and damages, as well as the restoration of the property, shall be awarded to the claimant.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 288, § 24; G.L. 1909, ch. 357, § 26; G.L. 1923, ch. 410, § 26; G.L. 1938, ch. 631, § 26; G.L. 1956, §

12-21-32

.

12-21-33.
Suspension of operators’ license for failure to pay costs, fines, fees, or assessments.

A judge of the superior or district court or the traffic tribunal may order the suspension of a person’s license issued pursuant to chapter 10 of title 31 if the person fails to pay court ordered costs, fines, fees, restitution or assessments within the time period provided for in an order of the court. The judge may order the suspension to be effective until the person complies with the court order.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 350, § 1.